Maine, session 132, LD551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §8054, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1977, c. 551, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Emergency. If the Governor has issued an emergency proclamation pursuant to
Title 37-B, section 742 and the agency finds that immediate adoption of a rule by
procedures other than those set forth in sections 8052 and 8053 is necessary to avoid an
immediate threat to public health, safety or general welfare, it may modify those procedures
to the minimum extent required to enable adoption of rules designed to mitigate or alleviate
the threat found. Emergency rules shall be are subject to the requirements of section 8056.
Sec. 2. 37-B MRSA §741-A is enacted to read:
§741-A. Limitation on emergency powers
The exercise of any emergency power a state or local official may have under the
Constitution of Maine or the laws of this State that binds or regulates the public is limited
as provided in this section.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Constitutional right" means any right guaranteed under the United States
Constitution or the Constitution of Maine, including, but not limited to, the right to:
(1) Travel, work, assemble and speak;
(2) Exercise religion without government interference;
(3) Make contracts and hold property without government interference;
(4) Be free from unreasonable searches and seizures; and
(5) Purchase and keep firearms and ammunition.
B. "Emergency order" means an order, decree, regulation or other mandate proclaimed
or promulgated by a state or local official.
C. "State or local official" means the Governor, a person within the executive branch
or an elected or appointed member of a municipal government.
2. Orders infringing on rights. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
an emergency order that is issued by a state or local official that binds, curtails or infringes
on the rights of private parties must be narrowly tailored to serve a compelling public health
or safety purpose. Only the Governor may issue an order that infringes on constitutional
rights, and that order must be narrowly tailored to serve a compelling public health or safety
purpose. Each emergency order must be limited in duration, applicability and scope in
order to reduce any infringement of the rights of private parties or constitutional rights.
3. Procedure for hearings on orders. A court of this State has jurisdiction to hear a
case challenging the legality of an emergency order, including compliance with the
limitations imposed on emergency orders pursuant to this section. The court shall expedite
consideration of a case brought pursuant to this subsection to the extent practicable.
Inequality in the applicability of the impact of emergency orders on analogous groups,
situations and circumstances may constitute one ground among others for a court to
Page 1 - 132LR0962(01)

411 invalidate or enjoin an emergency order, or some of its applications, on the basis that it is
422 not narrowly tailored to serve a compelling public health or safety purpose.
Sec. 3. 37-B MRSA §742, sub-§1, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. The Governor, during the pendency of a state of emergency, may not reissue or
renew an emergency proclamation, issue another emergency proclamation that is
substantially similar to one that expired or reissue an emergency proclamation
terminated by the Legislature without approval of the Legislature.
Sec. 4. 37-B MRSA §743, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 594, §34, is amended
to read:
2. Limitation. No A state of emergency may continue for longer than 30 days unless
renewed by the Governor not be issued for a period longer than 30 days. Any subsequent
renewal of the same state of emergency must receive approval by a 2/3 vote of each House
of the Legislature. If the renewal is rejected by the Legislature, the Governor shall issue
an executive proclamation ending the state of emergency within 24 hours of the rejection.
A new state of emergency may not be declared for at least 30 days without approval by a
majority vote of each House of the Legislature. The Legislature, by joint resolution, may
terminate a state of emergency at anytime any time. Thereupon, the The Governor shall
then issue an executive proclamation ending the state of emergency.